Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1602.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of November 22, 2005 (P.L.407, No.74), known as the Pennsylvania Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Screening Act, is amended to read:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Breast, Colorectal and Cervical Cancer Early Screening Act.Section 2. The definition of "program" in section 2 of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Colorectal cancer screening." Any of the following procedures that are furnished to an individual for the purpose of early detection of colorectal cancer:(1) Screening fecal-occult blood or fecal immunochemical test.(2) Screening flexible sigmoidoscopy.(3) Screening colonoscopy.(4) Screening barium enema.(5) CT colonography.(6) Multi-target stool DNA test.(7) Screening tests consistent with approved medical standards and practices for the early detection of colorectal cancer.* * *"Program." The Pennsylvania Breast, Colorectal and Cervical Cancer Early Screening Program established in section 3.* * *Section 3. Section 3 of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Pennsylvania Breast, Colorectal and Cervical Cancer Early Screening Program established.(a) Program established.--There is hereby established within the Department of Health a program to be known as the Pennsylvania Breast, Colorectal and Cervical Cancer Early Screening Program, which shall provide for the availability of [annual] breast cancer screening services, colorectal cancer 20250HB1602PN1918 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 screening services and cervical cancer screening services [for low-income underinsured and uninsured women who are 40 to 49 years of age.] at intervals recommended by clinical practice guidelines based on age and sex.(b) Screening services.--The program shall be administered by the department for [women] individuals who are eligible under subsection (c) and shall be targeted towards [women] residents of this Commonwealth who are at high risk for breast, colorectal and cervical cancer.(c) Eligibility.--To be eligible for the program, an individual must meet all of the following requirements:(1) Be [a woman who is 40 to 49 years of age.] any of the following:(i) A woman who is 40 to 49 years of age for breast cancer and cervical cancer screenings.(ii) For colorectal cancer screenings, an individual who is:(A) 45 years of age or older, or 40 to 45 years of age with a family history of colon cancer; or(B) within 10 years of the age of a first-degree family relative previously diagnosed with colon cancer.(2) Have a family income that does not exceed 250% of the Federal poverty level.(3) Have no health insurance coverage for screening mammograms, clinical breast examinations, Pap [tests and pelvic examinations for women.], HPV or co-tests, pelvic examinations or colorectal cancer screenings.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1602PN1918 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829